Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Employment-Related Discrimination

4-21-401. Employer practices.

It is a discriminatory practice for an employer to:

Fail or refuse to hire or discharge any person or otherwise to discriminate against an individual with respect to compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment because of such individual's race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin; or

Limit, segregate or classify an employee or applicants for employment in any way that would deprive or tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the status of an employee, because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin.

This section does not apply to the employment of an individual by such individual's parent, spouse or child or to employment in the domestic service of the employer.

It is not a discriminatory practice for an employer to institute a policy in the employer's workplace requiring that all employees speak only in English at certain times when the employer has a legitimate business necessity for such a policy, including, but not limited to, the safe and efficient operation of the employer's business, and the employer provides notice to employees of the policy and the consequences of violating the policy.

No employer shall terminate an employee who is a volunteer rescue squad worker, as this term is defined in § 7-51-210, because the employee, when acting as a volunteer rescue squad worker, is absent or late to the employee's employment in order to respond to an emergency prior to the time the employee is to report to the employee's place of employment.

An employer may charge against the employee's regular pay any time that an employee who is a volunteer rescue squad worker loses from employment because of the employee's response to an emergency.

An employer has the right to request an employee who loses time from the employee's employment to respond to an emergency to provide the employer with a written statement from the supervisor or acting supervisor of the volunteer rescue squad worker stating that the employee responded to an emergency and list the time and date of the emergency.

Any employee who is absent or late to the employee's employment in order to respond to an emergency shall make a reasonable effort to notify the employee's employer that the employee may be absent or late.

Any employee terminated in violation of this section may bring a civil action against the employee's employer. The employee may seek reinstatement to the employee's former position, payment of back wages, reinstatement of fringe benefits, and where seniority rights are granted, the reinstatement of seniority rights. The employee has one (1) year from the date of a violation of this section to file an action.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-2105; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 6; T.C.A., §4-21-105; Acts 2010, ch. 1089, § 1.

Cross-References. Maternity leave, §4-21-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 10 Tenn. Juris., Employer and Employee, §§ 5, 63.

Law Reviews.

Confusion over “Comparables”: Will the Sixth Circuit Stick to One Standard with Respect to “Similarly Situated” Employees? (David L. Hudson Jr.), 37 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 25 (2001).

Cutting Through the ADA Employment Fog: Supreme Court Helps Define Who Is Covered (Timothy S. Bland and Thomas J. Walsh Jr.), 35 No.12 Tenn. B.J. 18 (1999).

Effects of the Sutton Trilogy, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 705 (2001).

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

Government Contractors Beware: Recent Changes to Federal Affirmative Action Requirements (James Francis Barna), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Outrage in the Workplace: Using the Tort of Intentional Infliction of Emotional Distress to Combat Employer Abuse of Immigrant Workers (Meredith B. Stewart), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 187 (2010).

Perceived Disabilities, Social Cognition, and “Innocent Mistakes,” 55 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2002).

Proving an Employer's Intent: Disparate Treatment Discrimination and the Stray Remarks Doctrine After Reeves v. Sanderson Plumbing Products, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 219 (2002).

Revisiting the Tennessee Employment-At-Will Doctrine — What Is the Exception and What Is the Rule? (Frederick J. Lewis, Jeffery A. Jarratt), 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1989).

The Faragher and Ellerth Problem: Lower Courts' Confusion Regarding the Definition of “Supervisor,” 54 Vand. L. Rev. 123 (2001).

The New ADA Backlash, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2014).

The Sins of Innocence in Standing Doctrine, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 297 (2015).

What Disabilities Are Protected Under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973? (David A. Larson), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 229 (1986).

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).

When Telling the Truth Costs You Your Job: Tennessee's Employment-at-Will Doctrine and the Need for Change (Chad E. Wallace), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2003).

4-21-402. Labor organization practices.

It is a discriminatory practice for a labor organization to:

Exclude or expel from membership, or otherwise to discriminate against a member or applicant for membership because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin;

Limit, segregate, or classify membership or application for membership or to classify or fail or refuse to refer for employment on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin, in a manner that would deprive or tend to deprive any person of employment opportunities, or that would limit employment opportunities or to otherwise adversely affect the status of an employee or of an applicant for employment because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin; or

Cause or attempt to cause an employer to violate this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 8; modified; T.C.A., § 4-2106; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 6; T.C.A., §4-21-106.

4-21-403. Employment agency practices.

It is a discriminatory practice for an employment agency to classify or refer for employment, or to fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise to discriminate against any person because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-2107; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 6; T.C.A., §4-21-107.

4-21-404. Training program practices.

It is a discriminatory practice for:

An employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship, or on-the-job, or other training or retraining programs, to discriminate against an individual because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, or national origin, in admission to, or employment in, a program established to provide apprenticeship or other training;

An employer, labor organization, employment agency or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs, including on-the-job training programs, to print, publish or circulate or cause to be printed, published or circulated any statement, advertisement or publication relating to employment by such an employer, or membership in such organization or any classification or referral for employment by such labor organization, or relating to any classification or referral for employment by such an employment agency or relating to admission to, or employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training by such a joint labor-management committee indicating any preference, limitation, specification or discrimination based on race, creed, color, religion, sex or national origin; except that such advertisement or publication may indicate preference, limitation or specification based on religion or sex when religion or sex is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 10; T.C.A., § 4-2108; Acts 1980, ch. 732, §§ 7, 8; 1983, ch. 44, § 1; T.C.A., §4-21-108.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

4-21-405. Religious groups exempted.

This chapter shall not apply to religious corporations, associations, educational institutions, or societies, with respect to the employment of individuals of a particular religion to perform work connected with the carrying on by the corporation, association, educational institution, or society, of its religious activities.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 4-2109, 4-21-109.

Law Reviews.

Employment Discrimination by Religious Institutions: Limiting the Sanctuary of the Constitutional Ministerial Exception to Religion-Based Employment Decisions, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2001).

4-21-406. Religion or sex as bona fide occupational qualifications — Affirmative action plans.

It is not a discriminatory practice for:

An employer to employ employees;

An employment agency to classify, or refer for employment any individual;

A labor organization to classify its members or to classify or refer for employment any individual; or

An employer, labor organization, or joint training or retraining programs to admit or employ any individual in any such program;

on the basis of religion or sex in those certain instances where religion or sex is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of that particular business or enterprise.

It is not a discriminatory practice for a person subject to this chapter to adopt and carry out a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees so as to eliminate or reduce imbalance with respect to race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin, if the plan has been filed with the commission and the commission has not disapproved the plan.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-2110; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 9; T.C.A., §4-21-110.

Law Reviews.

Government Contractors Beware: Recent Changes to Federal Affirmative Action Requirements (James Francis Barna), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §4-21-406(b) neither takes affirmative action plans out of the realm of discrimination law nor contradicts United States Supreme Court opinions concerning the adoption of affirmative action plans; instead, it is a statutory defense to a claim of employment discrimination in violation of the Tennessee Human Rights Act, OAG 01-140 (9/4/01), 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 147.

4-21-407. Age discrimination.

It is not unlawful for an employer, employment agency or labor organization to:

Discriminate in employment on the basis of age where age is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the particular business, or where the differentiation is based on reasonable factors other than age; or

Observe the terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan, such as a retirement, pension or insurance plan, that is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no such employee benefit plan shall excuse the failure to hire any individual, and no such seniority system or employee benefit plan shall require or permit the involuntary retirement of any individual specified by § 4-21-101(b) because of the age of such individual, unless otherwise provided by law.

The prohibitions imposed by this chapter relating to age discrimination in employment shall be limited to individuals who are at least forty (40) years of age.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter relating to age discrimination in employment, it is not unlawful for an employer, employment agency or labor organization subject to the other provisions of this chapter to observe the terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan, such as a retirement, pension or insurance plan, that is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no such employee benefit plan shall excuse the failure to hire any individual, and no such seniority system or employee benefit plan shall require or permit the involuntary retirement of any individual covered by this chapter because of the age of such individual.

Nothing in this chapter relating to age discrimination shall be construed to prohibit compulsory retirement of any employee who has attained sixty-five (65) years of age and who, for the two-year period immediately before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or a high policymaking position, if such employee is entitled to an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit from a pension, profit-sharing, savings or deferred compensation plan, or any combination of such plans, of the employer of such employee, that equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four thousand dollars ($44,000).

It is not unlawful for an employer subject to this chapter to fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any individual because of such individual's age if such action is taken:

With respect to the employment of an individual as a firefighter or a law enforcement officer and the individual has attained the age of hiring or retirement in effect under applicable state or local law on March 3, 1983; and

Pursuant to a bona fide hiring or retirement plan that is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this chapter.

For the purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Firefighter” means an employee, the duties of whose position are primarily to perform work directly connected with the control and extinguishment of fires or the maintenance and use of firefighting apparatus and equipment, including an employee engaged in this activity who is transferred to a supervisory or administrative position; and

“Law enforcement officer” means an employee, the duties of whose position are primarily the investigation, apprehension or detention of individuals suspected or convicted of offenses against state criminal laws, including an employee engaged in this activity who is transferred to a supervisory or administrative position. For the purposes of this subdivision (e)(2)(B), “detention” includes the duties of employees assigned to guard individuals incarcerated in any penal institution.

This subsection (e) shall not apply with respect to any cause of action arising under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 U.S.C. § 621 et seq.), as in effect before January 1, 1987.

Acts 1980, ch. 732, §§ 10, 11; T.C.A., §§4-21-125,4-21-126; Acts 1988, ch. 714, §§ 1-5; 1992, ch. 1027, § 18.

Cross-References. Mandatory retirement age, §8-36-205.

Law Reviews.

Age Discrimination: A Growth Industry (Charles H. Anderson), 25 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1989).

Confusion over “Comparables”: Will the Sixth Circuit Stick to One Standard with Respect to “Similarly Situated” Employees? (David L. Hudson Jr.), 37 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 25 (2001).

Proving an Employer's Intent: Disparate Treatment Discrimination and the Stray Remarks Doctrine After Reeves v. Sanderson Plumbing Products, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 219 (2002).

4-21-408. Leave for adoption, pregnancy, childbirth and nursing an infant.

Employees who have been employed by the same employer for at least twelve (12) consecutive months as full-time employees, as determined by the employer at the job site or location, may be absent from such employment for a period not to exceed four (4) months for adoption, pregnancy, childbirth and nursing an infant, where applicable, referred to as “leave” in this section. With regard to adoption, the four-month period shall begin at the time an employee receives custody of the child.

Employees who give at least three (3) months' advance notice to their employer of their anticipated date of departure for such leave, their length of leave, and their intention to return to full-time employment after leave, shall be restored to their previous or similar positions with the same status, pay, length of service credit and seniority, wherever applicable, as of the date of their leave.

Employees who are prevented from giving three (3) months' advance notice because of a medical emergency that necessitates that leave begin earlier than originally anticipated shall not forfeit their rights and benefits under this section solely because of their failure to give three (3) months' advance notice.

Employees who are prevented from giving three (3) months' advance notice because the notice of adoption was received less than three (3) months in advance shall not forfeit their rights and benefits under this section solely because of their failure to give three (3) month's advance notice.

Leave may be with or without pay at the discretion of the employer. Such leave shall not affect the employees' right to receive vacation time, sick leave, bonuses, advancement, seniority, length of service credit, benefits, plans or programs for which the employees were eligible at the date of their leave, and any other benefits or rights of their employment incident to the employees' employment position; provided, that the employer need not provide for the cost of any benefits, plans or programs during the period of such leave, unless such employer so provides for all employees on leaves of absence.

If an employee's job position is so unique that the employer cannot, after reasonable efforts, fill that position temporarily, then the employer shall not be liable under this section for failure to reinstate the employee at the end of the leave period.

The purpose of this section is to provide leave time to employees for adoption, pregnancy, childbirth and nursing the infant, where applicable; therefore, if an employer finds that the employee has utilized the period of leave to actively pursue other employment opportunities or if the employer finds that the employee has worked part time or full time for another employer during the period of leave, then the employer shall not be liable under this section for failure to reinstate the employee at the end of the leave.

Whenever the employer shall determine that the employee will not be reinstated at the end of the leave because the employee's position cannot be filled temporarily or because the employee has used the leave to pursue employment opportunities or to work for another employer, the employer shall so notify the employee.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to:

Affect any bargaining agreement or company policy that provides for greater or additional benefits than those required under this section;

Apply to any employer who employs fewer than one hundred (100) full-time employees on a permanent basis at the job site or location; or

Diminish or restrict the rights of teachers to leave pursuant to title 49, chapter 5, part 7, or to return or to be reinstated after leave.

This section shall be included in the next employee handbook published by the employer after May 27, 2005.

Acts 1987, ch. 373, § 1; T.C.A., §§50-1-501 —50-1-505; Acts 1988, ch. 607, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 430, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

Cross-References. Leave for adoptive parents, §8-50-806.

Sick leave, §8-50-802.

Law Reviews.

Revisiting the Tennessee Employment-At-Will Doctrine — What Is the Exception and What Is the Rule? (Frederick J. Lewis, Jeffery A. Jarratt), 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, construction, OAG 87-193, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (12/17/87).

Constitutionality of proposed amendments, OAG 88-33, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (2/11/88).

Tennessee Maternity Leave Act, OAG 91-22, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (3/12/91).

Construction with federal act, OAG 94-006, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (1/13/94).